California, session 20252026, AB2234.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 21065.5 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:21065.5. (a) “Geothermal exploratory project” means a project as defined in Section 21065 composed of not more than six wells and associated drilling and testing equipment, including equipment and activities necessary to establish interconnectivity between wells and reservoirs, temporary roads, electric distribution lines, and infrastructure to provide power for drilling and testing equipment, whose chief and original purpose is to evaluate the presence and characteristics of geothermal resources before commencement of a geothermal field development project as defined in Section 65928.5 of the Government Code. Wells included within a geothermal exploratory project shall be located at least one-half mile, measured from any point along the wellhead location and well course, including the bottom of the wells wells’ interaction point, from geothermal development wells that are capable of producing geothermal resources in commercial quantities, except wells connecting to geothermal reservoirs whose permeability or capacity to allow the flow of geothermal fluids, including water, has been increased from its natural or original state through stimulation, horizontal drilling, the use of closed-loop configurations, or other techniques if the owner or and operator of the geothermal development well that is capable of producing in commercial quantities provides written consent for its location within that one-half mile.(b) Written consent pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be executed by a responsible officer of the owner or operator, as applicable. The owner and operator of a geothermal development well capable of producing in commercial quantities may require, as conditions of providing written consent, any or all of the following:(1) The geothermal exploratory project proponent demonstrates, through ongoing monitoring, that the project will not result in degradation of existing commercial geothermal resources, including no measurable decline in reservoir pressure, temperature, or steam output, and no induced seismicity exceeding site-specific thresholds, as verified by a third-party licensed geoscience firm approved by the Geologic Energy Management Division.(2) The geothermal exploratory project proponent demonstrates that the project will not impose any undue harm to the productive capability of any geothermal project operating under a power plant license approved by the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission or require any environmental mitigation to be imposed upon the holder of the license to operate in compliance with the project’s conditions of certification.(3) The geothermal exploratory project proponent accepts all costs associated with safeguarding existing geothermal resources from any loss of reservoir pressure, temperature, or steam output and contamination of the reservoir with unnatural fluids, and provides adequate financial assurances, including a bond or escrow fund sufficient to cover any required remediation, compensation, or infrastructure repair.(c) This section does not alter the Geologic Energy Management Division’s discretionary authority over well permitting pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 3700) of Division 3.